District of Columbia statutes.
20-725

Failure to render account.

A supervised personal representative may be removed as provided in section 20-527 upon failure to file an account or the accompanying certificate as required by section 20-721 .

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(rr), 42 DCR 63

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-725.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.